Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 8. Irrigation and Water Rights
§ 5. State engineer.

There shall be a state engineer who shall be appointed by the governor of the state and confirmed by the senate; he shall hold his office for the term of six (6) years, or until his successor shall have been appointed and shall have qualified. He shall be president of the board of control, and shall have general supervision of the waters of the state and of the officers connected with its distribution. No person shall be appointed to this position who has not such theoretical knowledge and such practical experience and skill as shall fit him for the position.

Cross references. —

For other provisions concerning state engineer, see §§

9-1-901

through

9-1-909

.

This provision was intended to give state engineer unlimited and uncontrolled authority over state waters.

State by Christopulos v. Husky Oil Co., 575 P.2d 262,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 268

(Wyo. 1978).

Unrestricted city right to use imported waters. —

Where a city has the unrestricted right to reuse, successively use, and make disposition of certain imported waters, there is nothing for the state engineer or the board to consider. Thayer v. Rawlins, 594 P.2d 951,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 407

(Wyo. 1979).

Appointment and confirmation need not be concurrent. —

Appointment of state engineer by governor and confirmation by senate need not be concurrent in point of time. People ex rel. Emerson v. Shawver, 30 Wyo. 366, 222 P. 11,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1924).

Confirmation after expiration of governor's term permitted. —

Appointment of state engineer could be confirmed by senate after expiration of governor's term without executive request. People ex rel. Emerson v. Shawver, 30 Wyo. 366, 222 P. 11,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1924).

The approval of governor's appointment may be made by the senate after the expiration of the term of office of the governor. People ex rel. Emerson v. Shawver, 30 Wyo. 366, 222 P. 11,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1924).

State engineer subject to removal by only governor. —

The state engineer is an executive officer appointed by and subject to removal by only the governor of In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in Big Horn River Sys., 835 P.2d 273,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1992).

The state engineer is not subject to impeachment; neither the Constitution nor the statutes contemplate that a district court should have the authority to remove or replace the state engineer as the administrator of Wyoming water. In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in Big Horn River Sys., 835 P.2d 273,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1992).

Term of engineer appointed to fill vacancy. —

A state engineer appointed to fill vacancy is entitled to hold office until the appointment and qualification of a successor. People ex rel. Emerson v. Shawver, 30 Wyo. 366, 222 P. 11,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1924).

Applied

in

In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in Big Horn River Sys., 753 P.2d 76,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1988).

Stated

in

John Meier & Son v. Horse Creek Conservation Dist., 603 P.2d 1283,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 492

(Wyo. 1979); County Court Judges Ass'n v. Sidi, 752 P.2d 960 (Wyo. 1988).

Cited

in

Farm Inv. Co. v. Carpenter, 9 Wyo. 110, 61 P. 258,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 8

, 50 L.R.A. 747 (1900); State v. Kelley, 17 Wyo. 335, 98 P. 886,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(1909).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Industrial Siting Legislation: The Wyoming Industrial Development Information and Siting Act — Advance or Retreat?” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 27 (1976).

For case note, “Importation Doctrine Applied to Water Transfers Within a River System: A Step Too Far,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 99 (1980).

For case note, “Water Law — The State Engineer's Authority with Reference to Change of Use, Place of Use, Point of Diversion, and Means of Conveyance of Water Embraced by Water Permits. Green River Dev. Co. v. FMC Corp., 660 P.2d 339,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 59 (1984).

For article, “Wyoming's Groundwater Laws: Quantity and Quality Regulation,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 39 (1989).

For case notes, “Water Law—Indian Law—Cowboys, Indians and Reserved Water Rights: May a State Court Limit How Indian Tribes Use Their Water?
In re The General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in the Big Horn River System and All Other Sources, State of Wyoming, 835 P.2d 273,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1992),” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 467 (1993).